Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2533
Violations; penalty.

Any person who willfully violates any provision of the County Civil Service Act or of the rules and regulations adopted under the act shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall, upon conviction thereof, be fined not more than five hundred dollars, or be imprisoned in the county jail for not more than six months, or be both so fined and imprisoned.

Laws 1974, LB 995, § 17;

Laws 2006, LB 808, § 21.

The board of county commissioners is required to bargain with its employees on all matters relating to employment except those covered by the specific provisions of these statutes. American Fed. of S., C. & M. Emp. v. County of Lancaster, 200 Neb. 301, 263 N.W.2d 471 (1978).